Maryland, session 2026, HB0172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–402.
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subtitle it is unlawful for any
person to:
(1) Willfully intercept, endeavor to intercept, or procure any other person
to intercept or endeavor to intercept, any wire, oral, or electronic communication;
(2) Willfully disclose, or endeavor to disclose, to any other person the
contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know
that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication in violation of this subtitle; or
(3) Willfully use, or endeavor to use, the contents of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know that the information was
obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication in violation
of this subtitle.
(c) (11) (i) 1. In this paragraph the following words have the meanings
indicated.
2. “Body–worn digital recording device” means a device worn
on the person of a law enforcement officer or a correctional officer that is capable of
recording video and intercepting oral communications.
3. “Electronic control device” has the meaning stated in §
4–109 of the Criminal Law Article.
4. “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” INCLUDES A
MUNICIPAL ENFORCEMENT OFFICER DULY AUTHORIZED UNDER § 6–103.1 OF THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE TO USE A BODY–WORN CAMERA DURING THE
COURSE OF THE OFFICER’S DUTIES.
(ii) It is lawful under this subtitle for a law enforcement officer or a
correctional officer in the course of the officer’s regular duty to intercept an oral
communication with a body–worn digital recording device or an electronic control device
capable of recording video and oral communications if:

HOUSE BILL 172 3
1. The law enforcement officer or correctional officer is in
uniform or prominently displaying the officer’s badge or other insignia;
2. The law enforcement officer or correctional officer is
making reasonable efforts to conform to standards in accordance with § 3–511 of the Public
Safety Article or § 8–211 of the Correctional Services Article for the use of body–worn digital
recording devices or electronic control devices capable of recording video and oral
communications;
3. The law enforcement officer or correctional officer is a
party to the oral communication;
4. Law enforcement or the correctional officer notifies, as
soon as is practicable, the individual that the individual is being recorded, unless it is
unsafe, impractical, or impossible to do so; and
5. The oral interception is being made as part of a videotape
or digital recording.
(iii) Failure to notify under subparagraph (ii)4 of this paragraph does
not affect the admissibility in court of the recording if the failure to notify involved an
individual who joined a discussion in progress for which proper notification was previously
given.
Article – Local Government
6–103.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE OR
AGENT OF A MUNICIPALITY WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO ACT AS A CODE ENFORCEMENT,
PARKING ENFORCEMENT, OR TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT OFFICER FOR THE
MUNICIPALITY.
(B) A MUNICIPALITY MAY ADOPT AN ORDINANCE OR A RESOLUTION
AUTHORIZING AN ENFORCEMENT OFFICER TO UTILIZE A BODY–WORN CAMERA
DURING THE COURSE OF THE ENFORCEMENT OFFICER’S DUTIES.
(C) A MUNICIPALITY THAT ADOPTS AN ORDINANCE OR A RESOLUTION
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH A POLICY
FOR THE ISSUANCE AND USE OF A BODY–WORN CAMERA BY AN ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER THAT IS CONSISTENT WITH THE POLICY PUBLISHED BY THE MARYLAND
POLICE TRAINING AND STANDARDS COMMISSION UNDER § 3–511 OF THE PUBLIC
SAFETY ARTICLE FOR THE ISSUANCE AND USE OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS BY LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS.

HOUSE BILL 172
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.